Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1688.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 2203, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2203. A. The Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation


Commission shall be an advisory body to the Executive Director of


the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department and shall consist of


eight (8) members who shall serve a term of six (6) years.


Effective January 14, 2019, all duties and powers of the Commission


shall be transferred to the Executive Director. Any provision in


statute that provides to the Commission authority that is not

Req. No. 2603 Page 1


advisory in nature shall be deemed to grant the duty or power to the


Executive Director. No more than one Commission member shall be


from any one county. The Lieutenant Governor shall serve as an ex


officio voting member of the Commission.


B. One member shall be appointed from each congressional


district, who shall be a resident and a qualified elector in the


district from which appointed, and the remaining members shall be


appointed from the state at large. If congressional districts are


redrawn each member appointed shall complete the current term of


office at which time a new appointment shall be made in compliance


with the redrawn congressional district.


C. Commission members shall be appointed by the Governor, with


the advice and consent of the Senate, and shall serve at the


pleasure of the may be removed with cause by the Governor. Whenever


a vacancy on the Commission occurs by death, resignation, or


otherwise, the Governor shall fill the same by appointment, with the


advice and consent of the Senate, and the appointee shall hold


office during the unexpired term. Each member shall hold office


until a successor has been appointed and qualified.


D. With the exception of the ex officio, no member of the


Commission shall seek election to a federal, state, or county office


while serving on the Commission.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 2204, is


amended to read as follows:

Req. No. 2603 Page 2


Section 2204. There are hereby granted to and imposed in the


Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department Commission, and in any


commission or body that may hereafter succeed to the powers, rights,


and duties of the Commission, the following additional powers,


rights and duties:


1. Sue and be sued;


2. Adopt, use, and alter an official seal;


3. Make bylaws for the management and regulation of its


affairs;


4. Appoint, prescribe the duties, and fix the compensation for


officers, agents, and employees;


5. Make contracts and execute instruments as in the judgment of


the Department Commission are necessary or convenient to the


exercise of the powers conferred upon it by law; and


6. Promulgate rules and policies necessary and convenient to


the exercise of the powers conferred upon it by law.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 2206, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2206. The chief executive officer of the Oklahoma


Tourism and Recreation Department shall be the Executive Director,


who shall be appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent


of the Senate, Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Commission and who


shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor and may be removed or


replaced without cause Commission. The Executive Director shall be

Req. No. 2603 Page 3


chosen with regard to knowledge, training, experience, and ability


to administer the functions of the Department. Compensation for the


The Commission shall establish the salary of the Executive Director


shall be determined pursuant to Section 3601.2 of this title.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2603 YG 1/14/2026 10:03:54 AM



































Req. No. 2603 Page 4